Illinois, session 104th, HB2386.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 3-699.26 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-699.26 new)7    Sec. 3-699.26. Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal license 8plates. 9    (a) In addition to any other special license plate, the 10Secretary of State, upon receipt of all applicable fees and 11applications made in the form prescribed by the Secretary, may 12issue special registration plates registered as Armed Forces 13Expeditionary license plates to residents of Illinois who have 14been awarded the Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal for service 15in the United States Armed Forces after July 1, 1958 and 16participated in U.S. military operations, U.S. operations in 17direct support of the United Nations, or U.S. operations of 18assistance for friendly foreign nations. The special plates 19issued pursuant to this Section shall be affixed only to 20passenger vehicles of the first division, motorcycles, and 21motor vehicles of the second division weighing not more than 228,000 pounds. Plates issued under this Section shall expire 23according to the staggered multi-year procedure established by   HB2386 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05048 LNS 15076 b1Section 3-414.1 of this Code.2    (b) The design, color, and format of the plates shall be 3wholly within the discretion of the Secretary. The Secretary 4may allow the plates to be issued as vanity plates or 5personalized plates in accordance with Section 3-405.1 of this 6Code. The plates are not required to designate "Land of 7Lincoln", as prescribed in subsection (b) of Section 3-412 of 8this Code. The Secretary shall, in his or her discretion, 9approve and prescribe stickers or decals as provided under 10Section 3-412. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122026.